Nevada, session 83, SB477.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Taxation for the continued
development and implementation of the Unified Tax System the
following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................. $12,457,960
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................. $15,281,906
2. Expenditure of $5,000,000 not appropriated from the State
General Fund or the State Highway Fund is hereby authorized
during Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal Year 2026-2027 by the
Department of Taxation for the same purpose as set forth in
subsection 1.
3. The sums appropriated by subsection 1 are available for
either fiscal year and may be transferred from one fiscal year to the
other fiscal year with the approval of the Interim Finance
Committee upon the recommendation of the Governor.
4. Any remaining balance of the sums appropriated by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)